Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1842
Municipality; duty to enact appropriate legislation; failure; effect.

Any municipality subject to the Civil Service Act shall, after September 6, 1985, enact appropriate legislation for carrying into effect such act. The failure of the governing body of any such municipality to do so shall be a violation of the Civil Service Act and shall be punishable as such.

Laws 1943, c. 29, § 17, p. 137;

R.S.1943, § 19-1817;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-1817;

Laws 1985, LB 372, § 21.